Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
E. Delegates

§ 17-19-640.
Delegates.

A corporation may provide in its articles or bylaws for delegates having some or all of the authority of members.

The articles or bylaws may set forth provisions relating to:

The characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations and obligations of delegates including their selection and removal;

Calling, noticing, holding and conducting meetings of delegates; and

Carrying on corporate activities during and between meetings of delegates.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.